Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.335

Coordination of county administrative programs—Legislative declaration.

The public necessity for the coordination of county administrative programs, especially in the fields of highways and social security, be and is hereby recognized.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.32.335. Prior: 1939 c 188 s 1; RRS s 4077-2.]